Maine, session 132, LD1811.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §4653, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Exemption from complaint filing fee. The court may not charge a fee for the filing
of a complaint in which the plaintiff swears that the complaint involves an allegation of
domestic or dating violence, sexual assault, stalking, sex trafficking or unlawful
dissemination of certain private images.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §4658, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Filing via e-mail. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the court
shall accept the filing by e-mail in accordance with the requirements of this section of all
documents in protection from harassment cases under this chapter except for complaints,
motions to modify, motions to extend and motions for contempt filed in cases that are not
exempt from the complaint filing fee under section 4653, subsection 4.
A. The party or the party's attorney submitting a document for filing by e-mail shall
submit the document in a file format approved by the court and to the e-mail address
established by the judicial branch for receipt of protection from harassment filings by
the District Court with jurisdiction over the case. The judicial branch shall specify the
approved file formats and applicable e-mail addresses on its publicly accessible
website, on all relevant court forms and in all public educational materials for
protection from harassment proceedings.
B. Each document filed by e-mail must contain an electronic signature of the attorney
or party filing the document either through a captured image of the attorney's or party's
signature incorporated into the document or through the name of the attorney or party
appearing on the document's signature line preceded by "/s/". An electronic signature
of a party need not be notarized if the party's electronic signature appears directly below
a declaration on the document stating the following:
"I swear under penalty of perjury that the above statements are true and correct. I
understand that these statements are made for use as evidence in court and that I may
be subject to prosecution for perjury punishable by up to 5 years in prison and a fine of
up to $5,000 if I give false information to the court."
An electronic signature that complies with the requirements of this paragraph has the
same force and effect as if the attorney or the party had signed and filed with the court
a paper copy of the same document.
C. The subject line of the e-mail must list the docket number of the case except that, if
there is no docket number, the subject line must contain the names of the parties to the
case.
D. A document filed by e-mail must be accompanied by a cover sheet containing, with
respect to the person who electronically signed the document, that person's name,
address, telephone number, e-mail address and, if the person is an attorney, the name
of the attorney's law firm and the attorney's Maine Bar registration number. If the
person who electronically signed the document is a party who has submitted an
affidavit or pleading under oath pursuant to Title 4, section 8-B, subsection 2,
paragraph B, the party may write "confidential address" in the address space on the
cover sheet. The judicial branch shall provide a copy of a sample cover sheet on its
Page 1 - 132LR1995(01)

414 publicly accessible website, with all relevant court forms and in all public educational
425 materials for protection from harassment proceedings.
E. The filing date for all documents submitted by e-mail as authorized in this subsection
must be the day, beginning at 12:00 a.m. and ending at 11:59:59 p.m., of the date that
the document was submitted, except that, if a document is submitted on a Saturday,
Sunday or legal holiday, the filing date is the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday
or legal holiday.
F. A party or party's attorney may not mail or deliver to the court a paper copy of any
document filed by e-mail.
G. A party or party's attorney may not include within an e-mail submitted to the court
any argument or dialogue between or among the parties.
Any e-mail filing that does not comply with the requirements of this subsection must be
rejected and not docketed by the court clerk.
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §4658, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Review of complaints and motions to extend filed by e-mail. A complaint or a
motion to extend that is filed by e-mail in accordance with the requirements of subsection
6 and is submitted before 3:00 p.m. on a day other than a Saturday, Sunday or a legal
holiday must be presented to a judicial officer, as described in section 4652, for review and
determination on the same day. A complaint or a motion to extend that is filed by e-mail in
accordance with the requirements of subsection 6 and is submitted after 3:00 p.m. on a day
that is not a Saturday, Sunday or a legal holiday must be presented to a judicial officer, as
described in section 4652, for review and determination on the next day that is not a
Saturday, Sunday or a legal holiday.
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §4658, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
8. Service of documents filed by e-mail. The court shall arrange for the service by a
law enforcement officer of a complaint or a motion to extend that is filed by e-mail in
accordance with the requirements of subsection 6. With respect to any other document that
is filed by e-mail in accordance with the requirements of subsection 6:
A. If both parties are represented by counsel, the filing attorney shall copy the opposing
counsel on the e-mail submitted to the court under subsection 6;
B. If the filing party is represented by counsel but the opposing party is not represented
by counsel, the filing attorney shall send a copy of the filed document to the opposing
party by regular mail. If the filing party is not represented by counsel but the opposing
party is represented by counsel, the filing party shall send a copy of the filed document
to the opposing party's counsel by regular mail; or
C. If neither party is represented by counsel, the filing party may not copy the opposing
party on the e-mail or send the filed document to the opposing party by regular mail.
Instead, the court shall send a copy of the filed document to the opposing party by
regular mail.
Sec. 5. 5 MRSA §4658, sub-§9 is enacted to read:
9. Response to motion to continue filed by e-mail. Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, the opposing party shall file a response within 3 days from the date
Page 2 - 132LR1995(01)

413 that a motion to continue is filed by e-mail in accordance with the requirements of
424 subsection 6.
Sec. 6. 19-A MRSA §4106, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
8. Filing via e-mail. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the court
shall accept the filing by e-mail in accordance with the requirements of this section of all
documents in protection from abuse cases.
A. The party or the party's attorney submitting a document for filing by e-mail shall
submit the document in a file format approved by the court and to the e-mail address
established by the judicial branch for receipt of protection from abuse filings by the
District Court with jurisdiction over the case. The judicial branch shall specify the
approved file formats and applicable e-mail addresses on its publicly accessible
website, on all relevant court forms and in all public educational materials for
protection from abuse proceedings.
B. Each document filed by e-mail must contain an electronic signature of the attorney
or party filing the document either through a captured image of the attorney's or party's
signature incorporated into the document or through the name of the attorney or party
appearing on the document's signature line preceded by "/s/". An electronic signature
of a party need not be notarized if the party's electronic signature appears directly below
a declaration on the document stating the following:
"I swear under penalty of perjury that the above statements are true and correct. I
understand that these statements are made for use as evidence in court and that I may
be subject to prosecution for perjury punishable by up to 5 years in prison and a fine of
up to $5,000 if I give false information to the court."
An electronic signature that complies with the requirements of this paragraph has the
same force and effect as if the attorney or the party had signed and filed with the court
a paper copy of the same document.
C. The subject line of the e-mail must list the docket number of the case except that, if
there is no docket number, the subject line must contain the names of the parties to the
case.
D. A document filed by e-mail must be accompanied by a cover sheet containing, with
respect to the person who electronically signed the document, that person's name,
address, telephone number, e-mail address and, if the person is an attorney, the name
of the attorney's law firm and the attorney's Maine Bar registration number. If the
person who electronically signed the document is a party who has submitted an
affidavit or pleading under oath pursuant to Title 4, section 8-B, subsection 2,
paragraph B, the party may write "confidential address" in the address space on the
cover sheet. The judicial branch shall provide a copy of a sample cover sheet on its
publicly accessible website, with all relevant court forms and in all public educational
materials for protection from abuse proceedings.
E. The filing date for all documents submitted by e-mail as authorized in this subsection
must be the day, beginning at 12:00 a.m. and ending at 11:59:59 p.m., of the date that
the document was submitted, except that, if a document is submitted on a Saturday,
Sunday or legal holiday, the filing date is the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday
or legal holiday.
Page 3 - 132LR1995(01)

F. A party or party's attorney may not mail or deliver to the court a paper copy of any
document filed by e-mail.
G. A party or party's attorney may not include within an e-mail submitted to the court
any argument or dialogue between or among the parties.
Any e-mail filing that does not comply with the requirements of this subsection must be
rejected and not docketed by the court clerk.
Sec. 7. 19-A MRSA §4106, sub-§9 is enacted to read:
9. Review of complaints and motions to extend filed by e-mail. A complaint or a
motion to extend that is filed by e-mail in accordance with the requirements of subsection
8 and is submitted before 3:00 p.m. on a day other than a Saturday, Sunday or a legal
holiday must be presented to a judicial officer, as described in section 4104, for review and
determination on the same day. A complaint or a motion to extend that is filed by e-mail in
accordance with the requirements of subsection 8 and is submitted after 3:00 p.m. on a day
that is not a Saturday, Sunday or a legal holiday must be presented to a judicial officer, as
described in section 4104, for review and determination on the next day that is not a
Saturday, Sunday or a legal holiday.
Sec. 8. 19-A MRSA §4106, sub-§10 is enacted to read:
10. Service of documents filed by e-mail. The court shall arrange for the service by
a law enforcement officer of a complaint or a motion to extend that is filed by e-mail in
accordance with the requirements of subsection 8. With respect to any other document that
is filed by e-mail in accordance with the requirements of subsection 8:
A. If both parties are represented by counsel, the filing attorney shall copy opposing
counsel on the e-mail submitted to the court under subsection 8;
B. If the filing party is represented by counsel but the opposing party is not represented
by counsel, the filing attorney shall send a copy of the filed document to the opposing
party by regular mail. If the filing party is not represented by counsel but the opposing
party is represented by counsel, the filing party shall send a copy of the filed document
to the opposing party's counsel by regular mail; or
C. If neither party is represented by counsel, the filing party may not copy the opposing
party on the e-mail or send the filed document to the opposing party by regular mail.
Instead, the court shall send a copy of the filed document to the opposing party by
regular mail.
Sec. 9. 19-A MRSA §4106, sub-§11 is enacted to read:
11. Response to motion to continue filed by e-mail. Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, the opposing party must file a response within 3 days from the date
that a motion to continue is filed by e-mail in accordance with the requirements of
subsection 8.